District of Columbia statutes.
9-107.59

District officials.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in § 9-107.58(c), the elected or appointed officials, officers, employees, or agents of the District shall not be liable personally for the payment of the GARVEE Bonds or be subject to any personal liability by reason of the issuance of the GARVEE Bonds, or for any representations, warranties, covenants, obligations, or agreements of the District contained in this part, the GARVEE Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents.

(b)

The signature, countersignature, facsimile signature, or facsimile countersignature of any official appearing on the GARVEE Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes notwithstanding the fact that the individual signatory ceases to hold that office before delivery of the GARVEE Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents.

History

Sept. 23, 2009, D.C. Law 18-54, § 10, 56 DCR 5694